Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall allocate moneys
from the Semiconductor Talent Sustaining Fund established in section 2 of this 2024 Act to
provide education, training and research to assist the semiconductor industry in:
(a) Propelling industry innovation and productivity; and
(b) Providing careers to residents of  this state who receive technical certificates, cre-
dentials, technical degrees,  associate degrees, bachelor’s degrees and graduate-level degrees
in fields related to semiconductors.
(2) When making allocations under this section, the commission shall consider allo-
cations that:
(a) Address the most-demonstrated pressing and long-term needs of  the semiconductor
industry;
(b) Advance a more diverse  workforce, with a focus on increasing career opportunities
for historically underrepresented youth and adults;
(c) Utilize the information compiled in and recommendations  made by the final report
of the Semiconductor Workforce and Talent Assessment (January, 2024)  that was prepared
for the commission;
(d) Facilitate or  advance workforce opportunities created by federal or state semicon-
ductor financial assistance investments;
(e) Create new economic growth and pathways  to economic opportunity across this state;
and
(f) Consider the priorities of  industry consortia established under section 10, chapter 28,
Oregon Laws 2022, that represent manufacturing and technology sectors.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Semiconductor Talent Sustaining Fund is  established in the State
Treasury, separate  and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Semiconduc-
tor Talent Sustaining Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the Semiconductor Talent Sustaining Fund shall consist of:
(a) Amounts donated to the  fund from individuals, private organizations and state or
federal governmental entities;
(b) Amounts  appropriated or otherwise transferred to the fund by the Legislative As-
sembly; and
(c) Interest earned by the fund.
(3) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to  the Higher Education Coordi-
nating Commission for the purposes of supporting the  semiconductor industry in the manner
described in section 1 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 3.
Sections 1 and 2 of this 2024 Act are repealed on January 2, 2030.
SECTION 4. The Semiconductor Talent Sustaining Fund established under section 2 of
this 2024 Act is abolished. Any moneys remaining in the  fund on the operative date specified
in section 5 of this 2024 Act shall be transferred to  the General Fund for general government
purposes.
SECTION 5. Section 4 of this 2024 Act becomes operative on January 2, 2030.
SECTION 6.  Section 1, chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 1.  (1) As used in sections 1 to 6 , chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2023  [ of this 2023 Act ]:
(a) “Covered entity” has the meaning given that term by 15 U.S.C. 4651(2).
(b) “Covered incentive” has the meaning given that term by 15 U.S.C. 4651(3).
Enrolled House Bill 4154 (HB 4154-B) Page 2
(c) “Federal semiconductor  financial assistance” means assistance available under the program
established pursuant to 15 U.S.C. 4652(a)(1) or 15  U.S.C. 4656(c)  for financial assistance to the
semiconductor industry.
(d) “Program grants and loans” means grants awarded and loans made under the  program de-
veloped by the Oregon Business Development Department pursuant to this section.
(2)(a) The Oregon Business Development Department shall develop  a program to award grants
and make loans from moneys in the Oregon  CHIPS Fund established under section 6 , chapter 25,
Oregon Laws 2023,  [ of this 2023 Act ] to businesses applying for federal semiconductor financial
assistance.
(b)(A) The program shall be administered by the department and the Governor as set  forth in
this section.
(B) Notwithstanding the duties and powers conferred respectively on the department and  the
Governor under sections 1 to 6 , chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2023  [ of this 2023  Act ], the department
and the Governor may consult each other with respect to any duty or power so conferred.
(c) It is the intent of the Legislative Assembly that program grants and  loans be treated by the
United States Secretary of  Commerce as covered incentives for purposes of the federal semicon-
ductor financial assistance program.
(3)(a) Program grant and loan proceeds may be used solely for:
(A) If a business’s application for federal semiconductor  financial assistance is approved, activ-
ities undertaken in connection with the federal semiconductor financial assistance program; and
(B) Regardless of whether a business’s application for federal  semiconductor financial assistance
is approved:
(i) The development of a site for  a semiconductor or other advanced manufacturing facility, in-
cluding, but not limited to, the acquisition and aggregation of land;
(ii) Research and development with respect to semiconductors or advanced manufacturing; or
(iii) Partnering with institutions of higher education, including, but not  limited to, historically
Black colleges and  universities, career technical training institutions, regional collaborative groups,
local workforce development boards as defined in ORS 660.300, programs funded through the federal
Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (P.L.  113-128) and apprenticeship programs registered
with the State Apprenticeship and Training Council for the purpose of workforce development  and
the creation of  training, registered apprenticeship and internship opportunities, with respect to
semiconductors or advanced manufacturing.
(b) Contractors and subcontractors on construction projects  funded by program grant or loan
proceeds must pay for such projects a rate of wage that meets or exceeds the greater of:
(A) The prevailing rate of wage for workers in each trade or  occupation in each locality as
determined by the Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries under ORS 279C.815; or
(B) The prevailing rate of wage as determined by the United States  Secretary of Labor under
the Davis-Bacon Act (40 U.S.C. 3141 et seq.).
(4)(a) A business that  is a covered entity may apply to the department under section 2 , chapter
25, Oregon Laws 2023,  [ of this 2023 Act ] for a program grant or loan.
(b)(A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, program  grants and loans may
not be awarded or made to any applicant in an amount greater than $50 million.
(B) The Governor may approve a program grant or loan under section  3 , chapter 25, Oregon
Laws 2023, [ of this 2023 Act ] in an amount greater than $50 million only after having given the
Legislative Assembly at least 30  calendar days’ notice of the amount of the program grant or loan
the Governor intends to approve.
(c)(A) Program loans:
(i) May be made  for a term not to exceed 10 years, as negotiated by the business and, in con-
sultation with the Governor, the department; and
(ii) Except as provided in section 5 (3) , chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2023  [ of this 2023 Act ], shall
be made at a zero rate of interest.
Enrolled House Bill 4154 (HB 4154-B) Page 3
(B) All amounts received by the department in repayment of a  program loan shall be transferred
to the Oregon CHIPS Fund established under  section 6 , chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2023  [of this 2023
Act].
(d) Proceeds from a program  grant or loan may be distributed in a single payment or in multiple,
conditional payments, as specified in the program grant or loan agreement.
(e)(A) Except as provided in paragraph (f) of this subsection,  for every $1 million in program
grant or loan proceeds received, the recipient business  must, over the period of the grant or loan
agreement, generate at least:
(i) If the term of the  agreement is not more than five years, $1.25 million in state and local re-
venue; or
(ii) If the term of  the agreement is more than five years, $1.5 million in state and local revenue.
(B) The department and the recipient business may specify in the program grant or  loan agree-
ment what the term “revenue” includes.
(f) In lieu of the requirement under paragraph (e) of this subsection, a  recipient business may
instead commit to the creation of new jobs in Oregon:
(A) At least 65 percent of which are permanent, full-time positions; and
(B) That pay on  average at least the average median income for the region of this state in which
the services will be performed.
(g)(A) In addition to program grants and loans, an application assistance grant, in  an amount
not to exceed $50,000, may be awarded to a business whose  application is approved under section
3, chapter 25, Oregon  Laws 2023  [ of this 2023 Act ], for the costs of preparing and submitting the
business’s application for federal semiconductor financial assistance.
(B) Application assistance grants may be made from moneys in the fund  or from any other
source of funding available for such purpose to the department or the Governor.
(5) Program grants receiving federal semiconductor financial assistance under 15 U.S.C.
4656(c) are exempt from:
(a) Subsection (4)(e) and (f) of this section;
(b) Section 2 (1)(b)(G), chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2023; and
(c) Section 5 (1)(a)(C), chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2023.
SECTION 7.
 Section 6, chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 6.  (1) The Oregon CHIPS Fund is established in the  State Treasury, separate and distinct
from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Oregon CHIPS Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund shall consist of:
(a) Amounts appropriated or otherwise transferred or credited to the fund by the Legislative
Assembly;
(b) Earnings received on moneys in the fund; and
(c) Other moneys, or  proceeds of property, from any public or private source that are trans-
ferred, donated or otherwise credited to the fund.
(3) Moneys in the Oregon CHIPS Fund are continuously appropriated to the  Oregon Business
Development Department for the following purposes:
(a) Paying  the actual costs incurred by the department in developing and administering sections
1 to 6 , chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2023  [ of this 2023 Act ]; [ and]
(b) Carrying out the  provisions of sections 1 to 6 , chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2023  [ of this 2023
Act]; and
(c) Transferring moneys to the Semiconductor Talent Sustaining Fund  established under
section 2 of this 2024 Act .
(4) Moneys in the Oregon CHIPS  Fund on June 30, 2023, shall be retained in the fund, and used
for the purposes set forth in subsection (3) of this section, until June 30, 2025.
(5) Any moneys remaining in the Oregon CHIPS Fund on June 30,  2025, shall be transferred to
the General Fund.
SECTION 8.
This 2024 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2024
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 4154 (HB 4154-B) Page 4
Passed by House March 6, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 7, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4154 (HB 4154-B) Page 5